Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.679

Washington mathematics placement test.

All public two and four-year institutions of higher education must use a common performance standard on the mathematics placement test for purposes of determining college readiness in mathematics. The performance standard must be publicized to all high schools in the state.

[ 2015 c 55 s 206; 2007 c 396 s 10.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.